en: Transfer Paper
xx: Transfer Paper
cs: Přenosový papír
da: Overførselspapir
de: Transferpapier
es: Papeles de transferencia
fr: Papier transfert
it: Carta trasferibile
ja: 転写紙
nl: Overdrukpapier
no: Overføringspapir
pl: Papiery transferowe
pt: Papel de transferência
ru: Переводная бумага
sv: Överföringspapper
tr: Aktarma Kağıdı

en: Vellum Paper
xx: Vellum Paper
cs: Pergamen
da: Pergament
de: Pergament
es: Papel vitela
fr: Papier vélin
it: Pergamena
ja: 羊皮紙
nl: Vellum
no: Vellumpapir
pl: Papiery welinowe
pt: Velino
ru: Велень
sv: Velängpapper
tr: İnce Parşömen

en: Craft Fasteners & Closures
xx: Craft Fasteners & Closures
cs: Hobby zapínání
da: Befæstelseselementer og beslag til håndarbejde
de: Befestigungen & Verschlüsse
es: Remaches y cierres
fr: Fermoirs et fermetures pour loisirs créatifs
it: Chiusure e cerniere per attività creative
ja: クラフトファスナー・留め具
nl: Bevestigingen en sluitingen
no: Festenåler og stifter til håndverk
pl: Ozdobne spinki i zamknięcia
pt: Prendedores e fechos
ru: Застежки и крепления для рукодельных работ
sv: Hobbyspännen och -fästen
tr: El İşi Sabitleyicileri ve Kilitleri

en: Buttons & Snaps
xx: Buttons & Snaps
cs: Knoflíky
da: Syning – knapper
de: Knöpfe
es: Botones y automáticos
fr: Boutons et fermoirs
it: Bottoni e automatici
ja: ボタン
nl: Knopen
no: Knapper og trykknapper
pl: Guziki czterodziurkowe
pt: Botões e colchetes de pressão
ru: Пуговицы и кнопки
sv: Knappar
tr: Düğmeler

en: Clasps & Hooks
xx: Clasps & Hooks
cs: Spony a háčky
da: Spænder og kroge
de: Schnallen & Haken
es: Hebillas y ganchos
fr: Fermoirs et crochets
it: Ganci e fermagli
ja: 留め金・ホック
nl: Gespjes en haakjes
no: Klemmer og kroker
pl: Klamerki i haczyki
pt: Fivelas e ganchos
ru: Пряжки и крючки
sv: Klämmor och krokar
tr: Tokalar ve Kancalar

en: Eyelets & Grommets
xx: Eyelets & Grommets
cs: Průchodky a nýty
da: Øjer og ringe
de: Ösen & Tüllen
es: Ojales
fr: Œillets
it: Occhielli e asole di rinforzo
ja: アイレット・グロメット
nl: Oogjes en ringen
no: Maljer
pl: Oczka i przelotki
pt: Ilhós e anéis
ru: Кнопки для застежек
sv: Snörhål och öljetter
tr: Delik Halkalar ve Rondelalar

en: Hook and Loop Fasteners
xx: Hook and Loop Fasteners
cs: Suché zipy
da: Velcrolukninger
de: Klettverschlüsse
es: Cierres de velcro
fr: Fermetures autoagrippantes
it: Chiusure in velcro
ja: 面ファスナー
nl: Klittenbandsluitingen
no: Borrelåser
pl: Rzepy do odzieży
pt: Fechos e ganchos
ru: Застежки-липучки
sv: Kardborrband
tr: Kancalı ve İlikli Kopçalar

en: Zipper Pulls
xx: Zipper Pulls
cs: Poutka na zipy
da: Lynlåshåndtag
de: Reißverschlussziehgriffe
es: Tiradores para cremalleras
fr: Languettes pour fermetures éclair
it: Tiretti per cerniera
ja: ファスナー引き手
nl: Ritstrekkers
no: Glidelåshåndtak
pl: Suwaki do zamków błyskawicznych
pt: Puxadores de zíper
ru: Бегунки для молний
sv: Tillbehör till dragkedja
tr: Fermuar Çekecekleri

en: Zippers
xx: Zippers
cs: Zipy
da: Lynlåse
de: Reißverschlüsse
es: Cremalleras
fr: Fermetures à glissière
it: Cerniere lampo
ja: ファスナー
nl: Ritsen
no: Glidelåser
pl: Zamki błyskawiczne
pt: Zíperes
ru: Молнии
sv: Blixtlås
tr: Fermuarlar

en: Craft Paint\, Ink & Glaze
xx: Craft Paint\, Ink & Glaze
cs: Hobby barvy\, inkousty a glazury
da: Maling\, blæk og glasur til håndarbejde
de: Bastelfarben\, -tinten & -lacke
es: Pintura\, tinta y esmalte
fr: Peinture\, encre et vernis pour loisirs créatifs
it: Smalto\, inchiostro e vernice per attività creative
ja: クラフト用絵の具・インク
nl: Hobbyverf\, -inkt en -vernis
no: Håndverksmaling\, -blekk og -glasur
pl: Farby\, tusze i laserunki
pt: Tintas para caligrafia\, esmaltes e tintas para artesanato
ru: Краски\, чернила и глазурь для рукодельных работ
sv: Hobbyfärg\, bläck och lasyr
tr: El İşi Boyası\, Mürekkebi ve Verniği

en: Art & Craft Paint
xx: Art & Craft Paint
cs: Umělecké a hobby barvy
da: Maling til håndarbejde og hobby
de: Kunst- & Bastelfarben
es: Pintura para manualidades
fr: Peinture pour loisirs créatifs
it: Pittura per hobby e artigianato
ja: アート・クラフト用絵の具
nl: Handwerk- en hobbyverf
no: Kunst- og håndverksmaling
pl: Farby dla artystów i rękodzielników
pt: Tintas para arte e artesanato
ru: Краски для рукоделия и хобби
sv: Konst- och hobbyfärg
tr: Sanat ve El İşi Boyası

en: Art Fixatives
xx: Art Fixatives
cs: Fixativy
da: Fiksérmidler
de: Fixative
es: Fijadores
fr: Fixatifs
it: Fissanti per pittura
ja: 絵画用フィキサチーフ
nl: Fixatieven voor kunstwerken
no: Fiksativer for kunst
pl: Utrwalacze malarskie
pt: Fixadores para trabalhos de artesanato
ru: Фиксативы
sv: Fixativ
tr: Çizim ve Boyama Sabitleyicileri

en: Art Ink
xx: Art Ink
cs: Umělecké inkousty
da: Blæk til kunstarbejde
de: Tinte für Kunstarbeiten
es: Tinta artística
fr: Encre artistique
it: Inchiostro per attività artistiche
ja: アート用インク
nl: Inkt voor hobbygebruik
no: Kunstblekk
pl: Tusze
pt: Tintas para caligrafia
ru: Художественные чернила
sv: Bläck
tr: Sanat Mürekkebi

en: Ceramic & Pottery Glazes
xx: Ceramic & Pottery Glazes
cs: Glazury na keramiku a kameninu
da: Keramikglasur
de: Keramik- & Tonglasuren
es: Esmaltes para cerámica y porcelana
fr: Émaux pour céramique et poterie
it: Smalto per ceramica e terracotta
ja: 陶磁器釉薬
nl: Glazuur voor keramiek en aardewerk
no: Keramikkglasur
pl: Szkliwo ceramiczne
pt: Vernizes para cerâmica
ru: Глазурь для фаянса и керамики
sv: Keramik- och lergodsglasyr
tr: Seramik ve Çömlek Sırları

en: Craft Dyes
xx: Craft Dyes
cs: Hobby barvy
da: Farver til håndarbejde
de: Färbemittel für Kunstarbeiten
es: Tintes artesanales
fr: Teintures pour loisirs créatifs
it: Coloranti per attività creative
ja: クラフト用染料
nl: Kleurstoffen voor hobbygebruik
no: Fargemidler
pl: Barwniki
pt: Tinturas para artesanato
ru: Красители для рукодельных работ
sv: Hobbyfärg
tr: El İşi Boyaları

en: Ink Pads
xx: Ink Pads
cs: Razítkové podušky
da: Stempelpuder
de: Stempelkissen
es: Almohadillas para sellos
fr: Tampons encreurs
it: Tamponi per inchiostro
ja: インクパッド
nl: Stempelkussens
no: Blekkputer
pl: Poduszeczki z tuszem
pt: Almofadas para tinta para caligrafia
ru: Штемпельные подушечки
sv: Bläckdynor
tr: Istampalar

en: Paint Mediums
xx: Paint Mediums
cs: Malířská média
da: Malemedier
de: Malgründe
es: Medios de pintura
fr: Médiums à peindre
it: Medium per pittura
ja: 油絵具メディウム
nl: Schilderhulpmiddelen
no: Malemedier
pl: Nośniki malarskie
pt: Materiais de pintura
ru: Основы для рисования красками
sv: Målningsmedia
tr: Resim Ortamları

en: Craft Shapes & Bases
xx: Craft Shapes & Bases
cs: Tvary a základy pro hobby techniky
da: Forme og skabeloner til håndarbejde
de: Formen & Rohlinge für Kunstarbeiten
es: Bases y formas
fr: Formes et bases pour loisirs créatifs
it: Forme e basi per attività creative
ja: クラフト用型紙
nl: Hobbyvormen en -ondergronden
no: Håndverksformer og -sokler
pl: Kształty i bazy
pt: Fôrmas e bases para artesanato
ru: Формы и основы для рукодельных работ
sv: Hobbyformar och -baser
tr: El İşi Modelleri ve Altlıkları

en: Craft Foam & Styrofoam
xx: Craft Foam & Styrofoam
cs: Výrobky z pěny a polystyrenu
da: Håndarbejde – flamingo og skum
de: Moosgummi & Styropor
es: Espuma y poliestireno extrusionado para artesanía
fr: Créamousse et styromousse
it: Schiuma e polistirolo per articoli artistici realizzati a mano
ja: ウレタンフォーム・発泡スチロール
nl: Handwerkschuim en piepschuim
no: Håndverksskum og isopor
pl: Rękodzieło z piany i styropianu
pt: Espuma e isopor para artesanato
ru: Листовая пена и пенопласт
sv: Skumgummi och frigolit för hantverk
tr: El İşi Köpüğü ve Strafor

en: Craft Wood & Shapes
xx: Craft Wood & Shapes
cs: Dřevěné odřezky pro hobby využití
da: Træ og forme til håndarbejde
de: Holz & Formen für Kunstarbeiten
es: Formas y tallas en madera
fr: Pièces de bois et formes pour loisirs créatifs
it: Forme e legno per attività creative
ja: クラフト用木材
nl: Hout en vormen voor hobbygebruik
no: Trefigurer
pl: Drewno i kształty
pt: Madeiras e fôrmas para artesanato
ru: Деревянные детали и формы для рукодельных работ
sv: Hobbyträ och -formar
tr: El İşi Ahşapları ve Modelleri